Massachusetts, session 194th, H1869.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 274 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 2 the following new section:-
(1) Whoever solicits, entices, counsels, procures, provokes, threatens, pays, agrees to
pay, or offers to pay a juvenile who has not attained the age of eighteen with the intent to have
said juvenile commit an armed assault on another person or murder and said juvenile does
commit or attempts to commit said armed assault on another or murder, shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for life or for any term of years, but not less than twenty years.
No sentence imposed under this subsection shall be reduced or suspended nor shall such person
so sentenced be eligible for probation, parole, work release, or furlough or receive any deduction
from such person's sentence for good conduct.
of 2

(2) Whoever provides, delivers, purchases, hands, counsels, provokes, or aids in
obtaining a juvenile under the age of eighteen a firearm, rifle, machine gun, automatic weapon,
or dangerous weapon as defined by M.G.L. 140, with the intent to have said juvenile commit and
armed assault on another person or murder shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison
for life or for any term of years, but not less than ten years. No sentence imposed under this
subsection shall be reduced or suspended nor shall such person so sentenced be eligible for
probation, parole, work release or furlough or receive any deduction from such person's sentence
for good conduct.
(3) “Armed Assault on another Person” shall be defined as any violation of M.G.L.
C. 265 § 14, 18A, 18.
(4) “Murder” shall be defined as any violation of M.G.L. C. 265 §1.
of 2